District of Columbia statutes.
2-631

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Disability” means, with respect to an individual:

(A)

A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of the major life activities of that individual;

(B)

A record of such an impairment; or

(C)

Being regarded as having such an impairment.

(2)

“Internet publication” means any information posted to an official web site of a public body, except for archival documents.

(3)

“Policies” means official instructions and guiding principles issued by a public body for the implementation of its programs.

(4)

“Public body” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 2-502(18A).

(5)

“Publications” means any written material issued by a public body, either for internal or external use, and does not include internet publications, policies, rules, regulations, and signage.

(6)

“Regulation” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 2-502(17).

(7)

“Rule” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 2-502(6).

(8)

“Signage” means any poster on paper larger than 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches issued by a public body and any signs regardless of size made of any material other than paper and posted or issued by a public body.

Sept. 29, 2006, D.C. Law 16-169, § 2, 53 DCR 6223